Tennessee statutes. Title 12 Public Property, Printing And Contracts
Part 4

State Surplus Personal Property Act of 1976

12-2-401. Short title.

This part shall be known and may be cited as the “State Surplus Personal Property Act of 1976.”

Acts 1976, ch. 821, § 1; T.C.A., § 12-235.

12-2-402. Part definitions.

As used in this part, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Commission” means the procurement commission;

“Commissioner” means the commissioner of general services;

“Personal property” or “property” means every species of state property which is not either:

Real property, the disposal of which is subject to this title, governing the disposal of state real property; or

Intangible personal property as defined in § 67-5-501, relative to the assessment of intangible personal property for tax purposes; and

“Surplus” or “surplus property” means that personal property which has been determined to be obsolete, outmoded, or no longer usable by the state and declared as such, by the commissioner or head of the releasing department or agency, in accordance with this part.

Acts 1976, ch. 821, § 2; T.C.A., § 12-236; Acts 2011, ch. 295, §§ 9(a), 19; 2012, ch. 626, § 4.

12-2-403. Methods of disposal.

No article or personal property may be disposed of as surplus except by one (1) of the following methods:

Public auction, publicly advertised and held;

Sale under sealed bids, publicly advertised, opened and recorded;

Sale by internet auction;

Negotiated contract for sale, at arms length; but only in those instances in which the availability of the property is recurring or repetitive in character, such as marketable waste products, for disposal of the property as it is generated in the most economically feasible, fiscally sound, and administratively practicable method for the state to utilize;

Trade-in, where such is permitted due to the nature of the property or equipment and under the terms and conditions of the contract by which the state replaces the property, and subject, further, to this part and the regulations of the procurement commission promulgated to govern the disposal of property by trade-in; and

Sale under rules and regulations as provided in subsection (d).

The procurement commission may promulgate special regulations for the disposal of surplus personal property, such as firearms, ammunition, and other explosives, which, by their character and utility, must be disposed of in a method consistent with prevailing federal law.

Political subdivisions of the state, governmental entities and corporations organized and conducted not-for-profit which have been approved as authorized donees under the federal surplus property program and not-for-profit federally financed rural electric cooperatives, as defined in title 65, chapter 25, may purchase personal property declared surplus and classified by the commissioner for disposal pursuant to § 12-2-407.

A member of the general public may purchase a bloodhound declared surplus and classified by the commissioner for disposal pursuant to the procedures established in § 12-2-407 for sales to governmental entities.

A member of the general assembly may purchase office furniture, equipment, or other personal property for use in the home district legislative office of such member if such furniture, equipment or property has been declared surplus and classified by the commissioner for disposal pursuant to procedures established in § 12-2-407 for sales to governmental entities.

The commissioner, with the approval of the procurement commission, may promulgate special rules and regulations in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5, to permit sales to nonprofit volunteer fire, police, and rescue organizations operated for a public purpose. Such regulations shall provide for sale of surplus property to such organizations on the basis of fair market value of such property as determined by the commissioner. Such regulations shall establish eligibility requirements for organizations to purchase surplus property under this subsection (d). Determinations of eligibility shall be made in accordance with rules and regulations promulgated under this section by the commissioner and all decisions of the commissioner shall be final. Such sales shall be subject to the restrictions contained in § 12-2-407.

The commissioner of finance and administration, with the approval of the governor and the attorney general and reporter, may approve the transfer of surplus personal property to a selected local government, with or without financial consideration, when associated real property is being transferred to that local government under provisions of this chapter; provided, that the authorizing officials named in this subsection (e) first must determine that such transfer of personal property ownership is in the interest of the state.

The commissioner of general services, with the approval of the governor and the procurement commission, may approve the transfer of surplus personal property to local government, with or without financial consideration; provided, that such property was initially acquired from the federal government for civil defense purposes; provided further, that the authorizing officials named in this subsection (f) first determine that such transfer of personal property ownership is in the interest of the state.

For purposes of this subsection (g), “computer equipment” includes personal computers, printers, CD-ROM readers, monitors, keyboards, CPU's, scanners, and all accessories and other peripheral equipment used in a data processing operation.

The commissioner of general services, in consultation with the information systems council, with the approval of the governor and the commissioner of education, is authorized to transfer surplus computer equipment to local education agencies, without financial consideration; provided, that such property is suitable for educational purposes for the public schools as determined by the commissioner of education; and provided further, that the authorizing officials named in this subsection (g) first determine that the transfer of such personal property ownership is in the best interest of the state.

Prior to the disposition of surplus computer equipment, a determination shall be made as to whether requests have been made by a local education agency for computer equipment. If suitable computer equipment is available which meets the needs of requests on file by local education agencies, such property shall be transferred, without financial consideration, to such local education agencies. If, however, available surplus computer equipment is not suitable for educational purposes or if no requests are on file by local education agencies for equipment which meets the needs of such requests, then the surplus computer equipment shall be disposed of as otherwise provided in this section.

The procurement commission shall adopt rules and regulations on the procedure for the disposal of such computer equipment as provided in this subsection (g) and, in consultation with the commissioner of education, on the procedures for a local education agency to apply for and be considered for receiving such property.

The department or agency which declares the computer equipment surplus may be charged a fee to cover the cost of disposing of such equipment. The amount of the fee shall be determined by the procurement commission.

Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, any surplus computer equipment held by the department of human services and not deemed to meet the needs of requests on file by local education agencies shall be transferred by the department of human services without financial consideration to community agencies that serve low income individuals.

Acts 1976, ch. 821, § 3; 1978, ch. 625, § 1; 1978, ch. 797, § 1; T.C.A., § 12-237; Acts 1981, ch. 181, § 1; 1981, ch. 319, § 1; 1982, ch. 845, § 1; 1993, ch. 299, § 1; 1997, ch. 52, § 1; 1997, ch. 359, § 1; 1997, ch. 474, § 1; 1998, ch. 853, § 1; 2001, ch. 90, § 1; 2007, ch. 411, § 1; 2011, ch. 295, §§ 9(a), 19; 2012, ch. 626, § 3.

Cross-References. Sale of timber as surplus personal property, §12-2-112.

12-2-404. Declaration of property as surplus.

Each article of personal property to be disposed of as surplus property under this part shall be declared surplus by the commissioner or head of the releasing department or agency in accordance with this part and the regulations of the procurement commission. The commissioner shall approve or disapprove any such declarations pursuant to regulations of the procurement commission.

Acts 1976, ch. 821, § 4; T.C.A., § 12-238; Acts 2011, ch. 295, §§ 9(a), 19; 2012, ch. 626, § 4.

12-2-405. Determination of method of disposal.

If the commissioner approves the declaration of property as surplus, the commissioner shall assign the property designated as surplus to one (1) of the four (4) methods of disposal set forth in this part, in accordance with regulations of the procurement commission. Such assignment and classification shall be duly recorded in writing with appropriate supporting documentation.

In classifying surplus property for disposal, the following criteria shall be considered:

The character, utility and functionality of the property;

The economies of disposal in light of all relevant circumstances attendant the proposed disposal, including the condition and climate of the potential market and present estimated market value of the property, transportation costs, and other cost factors associated with disposal; and

Sound fiscal and budgetary policy and practices.

Acts 1976, ch. 821, § 5; T.C.A., § 12-239; Acts 2011, ch. 295, §§ 9(a), 19; 2012, ch. 626, § 4.

12-2-406. Advertisement and notice.

Public auctions and sales under sealed bid, as provided in this part, shall be publicly advertised and publicly held. Notice of intended disposal by public auction or sale under sealed bid shall be entered by the commissioner in at least one (1) newspaper of general circulation in the county or counties in which the disposal is to be made. Such notice shall specify and reasonably describe the property to be disposed of, the date, time, place, manner, and conditions of disposal, all as previously determined by the commissioner in accordance with regulations of the procurement commission. The advertisement shall be entered in the public notice or equivalent section of the newspaper and shall be run not less than one (1) day. Disposal shall be made not sooner than seven (7) days after the last day of publication nor later than fifteen (15) days after the last day of publication of the required notice, excluding Saturdays, Sundays and holidays. Prominent notice shall also be conspicuously posted for ten (10) days prior to the date of disposal, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, and holidays, in at least two (2) public places in the county or counties where the disposal is to be made. Furthermore, notice shall be sent to the county clerk of each county of the state, and such notice shall be posted in each county courthouse unless otherwise directed by the procurement commission.

Notice of intended disposal by internet auction shall be posted on the internet. Such notice shall specify and reasonably describe the property to be disposed of, the date, time, manner and conditions of disposal, all as previously determined by the commissioner in accordance with regulations of the procurement commission.

Except as the procurement commission may promulgate rules to govern other notification to persons, firms and corporations of public auctions and sales, no person, firm or corporation shall be notified of any public auction or sale except as provided by this part.

The commissioner may promulgate special provisions regarding notice and manner of disposal of firearms, ammunition and other explosives as provided in this part and with respect to the trade-in of surplus property as provided in this part, such regulations to be subject to the approval of the procurement commission.

Acts 1976, ch. 821, § 6; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 22, 36; T.C.A., § 12-240; Acts 1981, ch. 332, § 28; 2001, ch. 90, § 2; 2011, ch. 295, §§ 9(a), 19; 2012, ch. 626, § 4.

12-2-407. Sale of surplus property to governmental entities and not-for-profit corporations.

The procurement commission shall promulgate regulations governing the transfer of surplus property to such governmental entities and corporations organized and conducted not-for-profit which have been approved as authorized donees under the federal surplus property program. Such regulations shall include, but not be limited to, prices to be set on items of surplus property, restrictions on the resale and the reversion to the state of any profit realized from any such resale. A not-for-profit corporation must first be listed as an authorized donee under the federal surplus property program administered by the department of general services. As the commissioner approves the declaration of property as surplus and assigns it for disposal, the commissioner shall set the price based on the fair market value for each item pursuant to the regulations of the procurement commission. Governmental entities and authorized donees may purchase such items at the price set by the commissioner at such times, as specified by regulations of the procurement commission, prior to the date of disposal by another method. For all surplus property, governmental entities and authorized donees shall retain possession of such property for one (1) year unless disposal is approved by the procurement commission. Transfers of surplus property shall be made at locations designated by the commissioner. Any transfer of motor vehicles, subject to the registration laws of this state, to a governmental entity or authorized donee, shall become null and void, and such property shall revert to the state if such governmental entity or authorized donee does not transfer the registration of title to such motor vehicle to its name within seven (7) days after the sale.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of law to the contrary, a designated nonprofit contractor or contractors of the department of human services have the first priority to purchase suitable and serviceable passenger motor vehicles which are declared to be surplus pursuant to this part for use by programs which have been or may be established by the department in which persons who are recipients of assistance in the families first program operated pursuant to title 71, chapter 3, part 1, or any successor program, or persons who are transitioning from those programs, are provided the opportunity to purchase such passenger motor vehicles as part of the person's efforts to obtain or maintain employment.

The designated nonprofit contractors designated by the department have first priority to purchase up to fifty percent (50%) of the available estimated yearly supply of the passenger motor vehicles declared as surplus pursuant to this part in fiscal year 2001, and up to twenty-five percent (25%) in each fiscal year thereafter at a price not to exceed the loan value of such vehicles. The price of such vehicles subject to this subsection (b) shall take into consideration the mileage and condition of the vehicle at the time it is offered for purchase.

Upon payment of the purchase price to the department of general services for the passenger motor vehicle, the nonprofit contractor designated by the department of human services shall receive possession of and title to the vehicle from the department of general services for use of the passenger motor vehicle in accordance with the department of human services' assistance program, or any successor program, under subdivision (b)(1) and in accordance with the contract between the nonprofit contractor and the department of human services.

Acts 1976, ch. 821, § 7; 1978, ch. 797, § 2; T.C.A., § 12-241; Acts 1981, ch. 319, § 2; 1982, ch. 845, §§ 2, 3; 1998, ch. 853, § 2; 2000, ch. 875, § 1; 2011, ch. 295, § 9(a), (g), (h); 2012, ch. 626, §§ 4, 5.

12-2-408. Payment — Transfer of possession.

Acceptable payment for property purchased under any method prescribed by this part shall be prescribed by the procurement commission in its rules and regulations.

Possession of property shall not pass until the occurrence of such conditions as the procurement commission may prescribe by rules or regulations; provided, that where payment is tendered by check or bank draft, transfer of possession shall be withheld until the check or draft has been honored by the drawee bank. Possession shall pass to political subdivisions of the state and other governmental entities upon receipt, by the state, of purchase vouchers of such political subdivisions and other governmental entities. Titles to motor vehicles sold as surplus property to political subdivisions and other governmental entities shall be closed as to the transferee when the title is passed.

Notwithstanding any other provision of the law, rule or regulation promulgated pursuant thereto, possession of property sold to any eligible corporation organized and conducted not-for-profit, whose chartered activities are related to health and/or education in accordance with the Official Compilation, Rules and Regulations of the State of Tennessee, rule 0690-2-1-.14 as promulgated by the procurement commission, shall not pass until payment is made to the state by an authorized signature on an authorized purchase order or check from such institution or by cash, cashier's check or certified check.

Notwithstanding any provision of this part to the contrary, acceptable payment for property purchased under any method prescribed by this part shall include payment by credit card.

Acts 1976, ch. 821, § 8; T.C.A., § 12-242; Acts 1983, ch. 244, § 1; 2011, ch. 295, §§ 9(a), (i), 19; 2012, ch. 626, § 6.

12-2-409. Disposal — Exempt personal property.

Disposal of surplus personal property which is determined to not be salvageable or usable, in accordance with regulations of the procurement commission, and disposal of surplus property in the collection of the Tennessee state museum, are exempt from this part; provided, that such disposals are made in accordance with regulations of the procurement commission.

Disposal of surplus personal property in the possession of the general assembly is exempt from this part; provided, that such disposals are made in a commercially reasonable manner pursuant to the policies and guidelines developed by the joint legislative services committee, created by § 3-10-101, and approved by both speakers.

A member of the general assembly may purchase office furniture, equipment, or other personal property for use in the home district legislative office of such member if such furniture, equipment or property has been declared surplus and classified for disposal pursuant to the policies and guidelines developed and approved pursuant to subdivision (b)(1).

Except as permitted by subdivision (b)(2), it is hereby declared unlawful for any state official or employee to purchase from the general assembly except by bid at public auction or by internet auction, using a personal computer on personal time, any surplus property during the tenure of such person's office or employment, or for six (6) months thereafter.

A purchaser who violates this subdivision (b)(3) commits a Class A misdemeanor.

Acts 1976, ch. 821, § 9; T.C.A., § 12-243; Acts 1981, ch. 277, § 1; 2011, ch. 295, §§ 9(a), 19; 2012, ch. 626, § 7.

Cross-References. Penalty for a Class A misdemeanor, §40-35-111.

12-2-410. Disposals — Procedures.

All disposals of surplus state personal property shall be conducted by the department of general services, in accordance with this part and applicable regulations of the procurement commission. The procurement commission may, however, in its discretion, designate the department having jurisdiction over the producing facility as the agent for disposal in the case of surplus agricultural products or livestock; provided, that such disposal is made in accordance with the other provisions of this part and the applicable regulations of the procurement commission.

Acts 1976, ch. 821, § 10; T.C.A., § 12-244; Acts 2011, ch. 295, §§ 9(a), (j), 19; 2012, ch. 626, § 5.

12-2-411. Disposition of proceeds.

The proceeds from the disposal of property under this part shall be remitted to the department releasing such property. The commissioner shall charge the releasing department a reasonable fee to cover the cost of disposition of the property, except where the releasing department is authorized pursuant to §12-2-410 to serve as the agent for disposal. The method of determining such fee shall be governed by regulations of the procurement commission.

Acts 1976, ch. 821, § 11; T.C.A., § 12-245; Acts 2011, ch. 295, §§ 9(a), 19.

12-2-412. Violations — Penalties.

It is hereby declared unlawful for any state official or employee to purchase from the state except by bid at public auction or by internet auction, using a personal computer on personal time, any surplus property during the tenure of such person's office or employment, or for six (6) months thereafter.

A purchaser who violates this section commits a Class A misdemeanor.

Acts 1976, ch. 821, § 12; T.C.A., § 12-246; Acts 1989, ch. 591, §§ 1, 6; 2004, ch. 554, § 1.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class A misdemeanor, §40-35-111.

State surplus property disposition regulations, violations, penalties, §§12-2-416,12-2-417.

12-2-413. Disposals pursuant to statute valid.

Bids, negotiations, purchases, trade-ins, and other procedures for disposal of surplus personal property authorized by statute and regulation shall not be construed as in violation of any law prohibiting arrangements, contracts, agreements, trusts, or combinations which lessen full and free competition in the disposal of state surplus personal property or which tend to control the price of such property.

Acts 1976, ch. 821, § 13; T.C.A., § 12-247.

12-2-414. Rules and regulations.

The promulgation of rules and regulations pursuant to this part shall be in conformity with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

Acts 1976, ch. 821, § 14; T.C.A., § 12-248.

12-2-415. State surplus property disposition regulation.

All arrangements, contracts, agreements, trusts, or combinations between persons or corporations made with a view to lessen, or which tend to lessen, full and free competition in the disposal of state surplus personal property, under this part, and all arrangements, contracts, agreements, trusts or combinations between persons or corporations designed to, or which tend to, control the price, which the state receives for such property, or the cost to the purchaser of such property, are declared to be against public policy, unlawful, and void.

Acts 1976, ch. 799, § 1; T.C.A., § 12-249.

12-2-416. Violation of § 12-2-415.

A violation of §12-2-415 is a Class E felony.

Acts 1976, ch. 799, § 2; T.C.A., § 12-250; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 23.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class E felony, §40-35-111.

State surplus personal property sales, violations, penalties, §12-2-412.

12-2-417. State employee violation — Punishment.

A state employee who violates §12-2-415 shall be punished by removal from employment in the state service and shall be prohibited from such employment for a period of five (5) years, in addition to the penalties provided in §12-2-416.

Acts 1976, ch. 799, § 3; T.C.A., § 12-251.

Cross-References. State surplus personal property sales, violations, penalties, §12-2-412.

12-2-418. [Repealed.]

Acts 2009, ch. 244, § 1; repealed by Acts 2013, ch. 118, § 1, effective April 12, 2013.

Compiler's Note. Former §12-2-418 (Acts 2009, ch. 244, § 1) concerned mining or recovery of lead found on state property as the result of discharging a firearm.

Former §12-2-418 (Acts 1989, ch. 328, § 1; 1992, ch. 988, § 5), concerning legislative office furniture, was repealed by Acts 1993, ch. 167, § 1, effective April 13, 1993.

12-2-419. Resale of surplus property — Disposition of proceeds.

Notwithstanding any provision of law, rule or regulation to the contrary, any profit realized from the resale of surplus property transferred to vocational programs operated under title 49, chapter 11, or state technical institutes operated by the state board of regents when such entity or corporation has repaired the item through its vocational program for the purpose of resale shall not revert to the state but may be retained by such entity or corporation. Notwithstanding any provision of the law to the contrary, such surplus property may be resold at any time after it has been repaired without prior approval of the procurement commission.

The resale of such surplus property shall be made only after public advertisement of the sale in a newspaper of general circulation in the county or municipality in which the sale will take place at least twice in a two-week period preceding the sale.

Acts 1991, ch. 364, § 1; 1994, ch. 709, § 1; 2011, ch. 295, §§ 9(a), 19.

12-2-420. Transfers of surplus personal property among governmental entities.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of law, counties, municipalities and metropolitan governments may purchase, trade or receive as a gift, upon approval of the governing bodies involved in the transaction, any used or surplus personal property from another county, municipality, metropolitan government, state government, federal government or any instrumentality of the foregoing, without regard to any laws regarding public advertisement and competitive bidding. Also notwithstanding any other provision of law, any county, municipality, or metropolitan government may by resolution or ordinance of its governing body establish a procedure for the disposition of its surplus personal property to other governmental entities, including, but not limited to, counties, municipalities, metropolitan governments, the state of Tennessee, the federal government, other states or their political subdivisions and the instrumentalities of any of the foregoing, by sale, gift, trade, or barter upon such terms as the governing body may authorize, without regard to any other provisions of law regarding the sale or disposition of used or surplus personal property.

This section shall be construed as supplemental authority for counties, municipalities and metropolitan governments.

Acts 1989, ch. 305, § 1; T.C.A. §12-3-1005.

12-2-421. Purchases of property at public auctions — Reporting.

Notwithstanding the requirements of its charter, or any other law, any municipality or county may purchase at any publicly advertised auction new or secondhand articles or equipment or other materials, supplies, commodities and equipment without public advertisement and competitive bidding. The governing body shall establish written procedures governing purchases at publicly advertised auctions.

If a municipality or county purchases any materials, supplies, commodities or equipment at a publicly advertised auction pursuant to subsection (a), then the purchasing official shall report the following information to the governing body of the municipality or county making such purchase:

A description of the materials, supplies, commodities or equipment that was purchased;

The auction where such items were purchased;

The purchase price of such items; and

The vendor of such materials, supplies, commodities or equipment.

Acts 1994, ch. 795, §§ 1, 2; T.C.A. §12-3-1006.